Rhode Island, session 2025, SB211.
It is enacted by the General Assembly as follows:
SECTION 1. Section 42-64-7.1 of the General Laws in Chapter 42-64 entitled "Rhode
Island Commerce Corporation" is hereby amended to read as follows:
42-64-7.1. Subsidiaries.
(a)(1) The parent corporation shall have the right to exercise and perform its powers and
functions, or any of them, through one or more subsidiary corporations whose creation shall be
approved and authorized by the general assembly.
(2)(i) Express approval and authorization of the general assembly shall be deemed to have
been given for all legal purposes on July 1, 1995, for the creation and lawful management of a
subsidiary corporation created for the management of the Quonset Point/Davisville Industrial Park,
that subsidiary corporation being managed by a board of directors, the members of which shall be
constituted as follows: (A) two (2) members who shall be appointed by the town council of the
town of North Kingstown; (B) two (2) members who shall be residents of the town of North
Kingstown appointed by the governor; (C) four (4) members who shall be appointed by the
governor; (D) the chairperson, who shall be: (i) the executive director of the Rhode Island economic
development corporation until such time that the secretary of commerce is appointed; (ii) upon the
appointment of a secretary of commerce, the chief executive officer of the Rhode Island commerce
corporation, who also shall be the secretary of the Rhode Island executive office of commerce; and
(E) non-voting members, who shall include the members of the general assembly whose districts

are comprised in any part by areas located within the town of North Kingstown and one non-voting
member who shall be a resident of the town of Jamestown, appointed by the town council of the
town of Jamestown. Upon receipt of approval and authorization from the general assembly, the
parent corporation by resolution of the board of directors may direct any of its directors, officers,
or employees to create subsidiary corporations pursuant to chapter 1.2 or 6 of title 7 or in the manner
described in subsection (b); provided, that the parent corporation shall not have any power or
authority to create, empower, or otherwise establish any corporation, subsidiary corporation,
corporate body or any form of partnership or any other separate entity, without the express approval
and authorization of the general assembly.
(ii) The approval and authorization provided herein shall terminate upon the establishment
of the Quonset Development Corporation as provided for in chapter 64.10 of this title.
(iii) The Quonset Development Corporation shall be deemed a subsidiary of the Rhode
Island commerce corporation:
(A) As set forth in § 42-64.10-6(3); and
(B) Insofar as it exercises any powers and duties delegated to it by the corporation pursuant
to this chapter for any project other than on real and personal property owned, leased, or under the
control of the corporation located in the town of North Kingstown, and the corporation shall be
deemed to have authority to delegate any of its powers, with the exception of the power to issue
any form of negotiable bonds or notes and the power of eminent domain, in order to accomplish
the purposes of chapter 64.10 of this title; provided, however, that the corporation may, as provided
for in this chapter, issue bonds or exercise the power of eminent domain on behalf of the Quonset
Development Corporation or to undertake a project of the Quonset Development Corporation.
(b) As used in this section, “subsidiary public corporation” means a corporation created
pursuant to the provisions of this section. The person or persons directed by the resolution referred
to in subsection (a) shall prepare articles of incorporation setting forth: (1) the name of the
subsidiary public corporation; (2) the period of duration, which may be perpetual; (3) the purpose
or purposes for which the subsidiary public corporation is organized which shall not be more
extensive than the purposes of the corporation set forth in § 42-64-5; (4) the number of directors
(which may, but need not be, more than one) constituting the initial board of directors and their
names and business or residence addresses; (5) the name and business or residence address of the
person preparing the articles of incorporation; (6) the date when corporate existence shall begin
(which shall not be earlier than the filing of the articles of incorporation with the secretary of state
as provided in this subsection); (7) any provision, not inconsistent with law, that the board of
directors elect to set forth in the articles of incorporation for the regulation of the internal affairs of
LC000943 - Page 2 of 6

the subsidiary public corporation; and (8) a reference to the form of authorization and approval by
the general assembly and to the resolution of the board of directors authorizing the preparation of
the articles of incorporation. Duplicate originals of the articles of incorporation shall be delivered
to the secretary of state. If the secretary of state finds that the articles of incorporation conform to
the provisions of this subsection, the secretary shall endorse on each of the duplicate originals the
word “Filed,” and the month, day, and year of the filing; file one of the duplicate originals in the
secretary's office; and a certificate of incorporation to which the secretary shall affix the other
duplicate original. No filing fees shall be payable upon the filing of articles of incorporation. Upon
the issuance of the certificate of incorporation or upon a later date specified in the articles of
incorporation, the corporate existence shall begin and the certificate of incorporation shall be
conclusive evidence that all conditions precedent required to be performed have been complied
with and that the subsidiary public corporation has been duly and validly incorporated under the
provisions hereof. The parent corporation may transfer to any subsidiary public corporation any
moneys, real, personal, or mixed property or any project in order to carry out the purposes of this
chapter. Each subsidiary public corporation shall have all the powers, privileges, rights, immunities,
tax exemptions, and other exemptions of the parent corporation except to the extent that the articles
of incorporation of the subsidiary public corporation shall contain an express limitation and except
that the subsidiary public corporation shall not have the condemnation power contained in § 42-
64-9, nor shall it have the powers contained in, or otherwise be subject to, the provisions of § 42-
64-12 and § 42-64-13(a), nor shall it have the power to create, empower, or otherwise establish
any corporation, subsidiary corporation, corporate body, any form of partnership, or any other
separate entity, without the express approval and authorization of the general assembly.
(c) Any subsidiary corporation shall not be subject to the provisions of § 42-64-8(a), (c),
and (d), except as otherwise provided in the articles of incorporation of the subsidiary corporation.
(d) The Rhode Island commerce corporation, as the parent corporation of the Rhode Island
Airport Corporation, shall not be liable for the debts or obligations or for any actions or inactions
of the Rhode Island Airport Corporation, unless the Rhode Island commerce corporation expressly
agrees otherwise in writing.
(e) The East Providence Waterfront District shall, with the approval of its commission and
the board of directors of the corporation, be a subsidiary of the Rhode Island commerce corporation
for the purposes of exercising such powers of the corporation as the board of directors shall
determine, and notwithstanding the requirements of subsection (b), the act creating the District shall
be deemed fully satisfactory for the purposes of this section regarding the establishment of
subsidiary public corporations, and the express approval and authorization of the general assembly
LC000943 - Page 3 of 6

shall be deemed to have been given for all legal purposes for the creation and lawful management
of a subsidiary corporation created for the purposes of implementing the purposes of the District.
(f) The parent corporation is hereby authorized and empowered to create a subsidiary
corporation for the expressed purpose to issue bonds and notes of the type and for those projects
and purposes specified in the Joint Resolution and Act of the general assembly adopted by the
Rhode Island house of representatives and the Rhode Island senate.
(g) The I-195 redevelopment district shall be a subsidiary of the Rhode Island commerce
corporation for the purposes of exercising such powers of the corporation as the board of directors
shall determine, and notwithstanding the requirements of subsection (b), the chapter creating the
district shall be deemed fully satisfactory for the purposes of this section regarding the
establishment of subsidiary public corporations, and the express approval and authorization of the
general assembly shall be deemed to have been given for all legal purposes for the creation and
lawful management of a subsidiary corporation created for the purposes of implementing the
purposes of the district.
(h) The Rhode Island airport corporation — appointment of directors:
The board of directors of the Rhode Island airport corporation shall consist of seven (7)
members: The board of directors shall have extensive experience in the fields of finance, business,
construction, and/or organized labor.
The governor of the State of Rhode Island shall appoint, with the advice and consent of the
senate when nominated to serve, the seven (7) members of the board of directors. The mayor of
Warwick shall, within thirty (30) days of the effective date of this section, submit a list of three (3)
individuals that the governor shall give due consideration in appointing one individual from this
list. The governor shall appoint the remaining six (6) members without regard to the list provided
by the mayor of Warwick. One director shall be appointed for a term of one year; two (2) directors,
one of whom is an appointment of the governor, shall be an individual appointed after due
consideration of the list submitted by the mayor of Warwick, shall be appointed for a term of two
(2) years; three (3) directors shall be appointed for a term of three (3) years; and one director shall
be appointed for a term of four (4) years. Appointments made thereafter shall be for four-year (4)
terms.
Any vacancy occurring in the board of directors shall be filled by the governor of the State
of Rhode Island with the advice and consent of the senate in the same manner prescribed for the
original appointments.
A director appointed to fill a vacancy of a director appointed by the governor of the State
of Rhode Island shall be appointed with the advice and consent of the senate for the unexpired
LC000943 - Page 4 of 6

portion of the term of office of the director whose vacancy is to be filled.
All members of the board of directors of the Rhode Island airport corporation shall serve
without compensation.
SECTION 2. This act shall take effect upon passage.
========
LC000943
========
LC000943 - Page 5 of 6